07_Project/apertium-clt.clt.lexd
#Morphological Transducer for Lautu Chin
#Part of speech categories
#<n>      #Noun
#<v>      #Verb
#<adj>    #Adjective
#<num>    #Numeral

#<sent>   #Sentence-ending punctuation
#<guio>   #Hyphen
#<cm>     #Comma
#<apos>   #Apostrophe
#<quot>   #Quotation mark
#<lquot>  #Left quotation mark
#<rquot>  #Right quotation mark
#<lpar>   #Left parenthesis
#<rpar>   #Right parenthesis

#Number morphology
#<pl>     #Plural
#<sg>     #Singular

#Other symbols
#>        #Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                      M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
##Example inflection pattern:
#NounRoot RegNounInfl
VRoot VerbInfl
NRoot [<n>:]
NPRoot [<np>:]
Adj [<adj>:]
Number
Punctuation
ClosedClass

Adv
NAgr

LEXICON VerbInfl
<v>:
<v>+aa<irr>:'a
<v>+ta<part>:ta
<v>+pa<nmlz>:pa

##Example inflection lexicon:
#LEXICON RegNounInfl
#<n><sg>:
#<n><pl>:>s


###############################################################################
###                         L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

##Nouns
LEXICON NRoot
aa:aa #chicken
aachiy:aachiy #chia seeds
aaluv:aaluv #potato
aata\maamawhnaa:aata\maamawhnaa #pennywort
aa\taa:aa\taa #chick
aciycaapa:aciycaapa #purple
aciycaa\vawpa:aciycaa\vawpa #indigo
acyi:acyi #lump of clay
adaa:adaa #seedling
ahe:ahe #mango
ahehaw:ahehaw #mango peel
ahringpa:ahringpa #green
ahringvaapa:ahringvaapa #light green
ahringvawpa:ahringvawpa #dark green
aing:aing #chicken house
ale\uovya:ale\uovya #Thai pea eggplant
alung:alung #rock
aluosiy:aluosiy #reason
alyizoung:alyizoung #brown
amepa:amepa #yellow
anaa:anaa #water buffalo
apacuvtuv:apacuvtuv #teacher
aphaa:aphaa #bamboo mat
apuv:apuv #shack
ariythyi:ariythyi #bamboo shoot
artiy:artiy #egg
aruo:aruo #horse
aruoing:aruoing #stable
aruopa:aruopa #white
asepa:asepa #red
asevaapa:asevaapa #violet
asevawpa:asevawpa #burgundy
athlaa:athlaa #soul/ghost
atiy:atiy #chicken egg
avawpa:avawpa #black
avuo\azoung:avuo\azoung #blue
azaw:azaw #monkey
babya:babya #Thai eggplant
bapaa:bapaa #mushroom
basa:basa #taro
bawbawta:bawbawta #box
bawkaw:bawkaw #kidney
bawlung:bawlung #ball
bawtung:bawtung #upper leg
be:be #cheek
bi:bi #pot
bie:bie #yam
bienaing:bienaing #church
bisakuv:bisakuv #chayote squash
buohlaa\saata:buohlaa\saata #banana flower
buohla:buohla #banana
buohlaahaw:buohlaahaw #banana peel
buohriy:buohriy #shirt
buohriy:buohriy #jacket
buotung:buotung #upper arm
buv:buv #nest
byabyata:byabyata #bottle
byihlyi\azoung:byihlyi\azoung #orange color
byihlyi:byihlyi #orange
bykaw:bykaw #foodbox
caa:caa #letter
caabaw:caabaw #mailbox
caauv:caauv #book
caauvming:caauvming #title
cabya:cabya #table
cacunghnaa:cacunghnaa #chest
cahnie:cahnie #fox
cakhaw:cakhaw #ankle bone
cakhya'ya:cakhya'ya #chin
cakuv:cakuv #porcupine
calery:calery #celery
canepa:canepa #elk
camaa:camaa #calf
canu:canu #January
canungbachuv:canungbachuv #hearts of palm
canungnung:canungnung #woman
capaapaa:capaapaa #man
caava:caava #river
caw:caw #clothes 
cawpe:cawpe #duck
cawpetiy:cawpetiy #duck egg 
cawsaa:cawsaa #human
cawsaapaa:cawsaapaa #person
cawsa:cawsa #person
chaapie:chaapie #soap
chadaw:chadaw #store
chechiy:chechiy #tool
chiepa:chiepa #June
chuelyi:chuelyi #world, earth 
chubalilipah:chubalilipah #butterfly 
chuo:chuo #time, period, generation
chuovyi:chuovyi #corn
ciehluv:ciehluv #indian gooseberry
ciy:ciy #seed
ciykhuv:ciykhuv #reindeer
ciytiy:ciytiy #oil
cizung:cizung #knife
cue:cue #cow
cuesaa:cuesaa #beef
cungle:cungle #coat
cungle:cungle #jacket
cuo:cuo #time frame
cuv:cuv #hand
daa\azoung:daa\azoung #bronze
dakhung:dakhung #floor 
dang:dang #length
diypa:diypa #December
haa:haa #teeth
haaseta:haaseta #newborn
haatiynung:haatiynung #girl
haatiyta:haatiyta #boy
haatiytapa:haatyitapa #boy
haatiytie:haatiytie #children
hlaa:hlaa #song
hlawping:hlawping #air potato
hlyidaw:hlyidaw #stairs
hmaa:hmaa #wound
hmang:hmang #place, thing
hmiekkhuv:hmiekkhuv #roselle
hmung\thlu:hmung\thlu #eagle
hnaacabuv:hnaacabuv #nose
hnaa:hnaa #leaf
hnaahne:hnaahne #mustard greens
hringna:hringna #life
iesing:iesing #ginger
ing:ing #house
ingchiy:ingchiy #door
ingchungkhue:ingchungkhue #family
ingkaw:ingkaw #June plum
ingkhuo:ingkhuo #room
ingphiy:inhphiy #broom
kawpuv\hlung:kawpuv\hlung #cabbage
kawpuv:kawpuv #collard greens
kawtung:kawtung #finish line
ke:ke #back (of body)
khukhu:khukhu #bean
khuv:khuv #cover
khycuo:khycuo #season
khy:kyi #rain
khypa:khypa #July
kung:kung #plant
kung:kung #tree			<<<REVIEW
kuvcakhiy:kuvcakhiy #elbow
kuvdaw:kuvdaw #finger
kuv:kuv #hand
lakaw:lakaw #buttocks
lasaw:lasaw #gift
letung:letung #shoulder
lidu:lidu #heel
lu:lu #farm, field
luathlutuv:luathlutuv #farmer
luopuv:luopuv #road
luv:luv #head
maakalaw:maakalaw #guava
maamaw:maamaw #pumpkin
mahuhnaa:mahuhnaa #culantro
mathin:mathin #peach
maw:maw #morning
mawsa:mawsa #morning meal
mie:mie #goat
mingcuokaruvnung\azoung:mingcuokaruvnung\azoung #pink color
minghming:minghming #eyelash
ming:ming #eyes
mingcakuvnung:mingcakuvnung #turtle
mingnung:mingnung #grandmother
mingpa:mingpa #grandfather
mingpalong:mingpalong #eyeball
mingruo\ciehluv:mingruo\ciehluv #plum
mingsuv:mingsuv #grape
mingtluo:mingtluo #eyebrow
muo:muo #price
muomuo:muomuo #rice (cooked)
myi:myi #fire
naakaryi:naakaryi #ear
nannan:nannan #parsley
ngaa:ngaa #fish
nge:nge #human body
nguo\azoung:nguo\azoung #silver
ning:ning #sun
ningdiy:ningdiy #shade
nung:nung #mother
oohie:oohie #chilis
paa:paa #father
paapaapa:paapaapa #flower
pacah:pacah #lungs
pacu:pacu #March
pakaa:pakaa #lip, plate
pakhuv:pakhuv #knee
palung:palung #heart
palyi:palyi #tongue
pang:pang #blanket, shawl
pasuv:pasuv #sugarcane
pathiy:pathiy #liver
patiy:patiy #corn stew
patung:patung #April
pavaa:pavaa #bird
pazi:pazi #February
paziy:paziy #cucumber
pazuv:pazuv #mouse
peti:peti #winged bean
peti:peti #okra
phiekhaw:phiekhaw #spoons
phietla:phietla #spoon
phiepuv:phiepuv #November
phieta:phieta #October
phungbie:phungbie #commandment
phungpa:phungpa #story
phyapa:phyapa #May
phyidaw:phyidaw #toes
phyihnie:phyihnie #footprint
phyi:phyi #foot
piesiy\hna:piesiy\hna #green onion
piesiy:piesiy #onion
piu:piu #festival
profet:profet #prophet
pyi:pyi #event
raah:raah #crow, vulture
rawtuv:rawtuv #pineapple
re:re #work, job
riy:riy #abdomen, waist, stomach
riyvaalepa:riyvaalepa #large intestine
riyvaataata:riyvaataata #small intestine
ruekatung:ruekatung #neck
rue:rue #neck
ruo:ruo #forest
saa:saa #flesh/meat
saacapaa:saacapaa #son
sabuti:sabuti #stew
sacuo:sacuo #rice
sahming:sahming #salmonberry
sapaw:sapaw #papaya
sa:sa #food			<<<REVIEW
sanhie:sanhie #fox
saruopa:saruopa #animals
savi:savi #rabbit
sawbya:sawbya #fishing basket
sawhue:sawhue #pomelo
sebing:sebing #bicycle
sieing:sieing #school
siymaluo:siymaluo #clock, hour
singbie:singbie #garlic
siy\azoung:siy\azoung #gold
suena:suena #sin
suo:suo #hair
suobuv:suobuv #strand of hair
suopa:suopa #men basket
syinga:syinga #basket cord
syry:syry #basket [to put spoons] 
taataapa:taataapa #insects
tarepa:tarepa #cidada
taw:taw #key
thawpat:thawpat #avocado
thingce:thingce #tree branch
thiy:thiy #death
tiydiy:tiydiy #drop of water
thlaapa:thlaapa #moon
thlaa:thlaa #month
thlaluoaw:thlaluoaw #window
thlaluo:thlaluo #mirror
thlaruo:thlaruo #September
thlazing:thlazing #August
thliy:thliy #wind(breeze)
thung:thung #three
tingkhung:tingkhung #tree
titaw:titaw #pear
tiypalaw:tiypalaw #boat
tiy:tiy #water
tluo:tluo #mountain
tluo:tluo #mountain
tluphie:tluphie #porch
tuokaa:tuokaa #money
tuokung:tuokung #machete
uohnaa:uohnaa #vegetables
uocuokhah:uocuokhah #bitter gourd
uovya:uovya #pumpkin on a stick
uv:uv #dog
va:va #pig 
vaing:vaing #pig house
vasaa:vasaa #pork
viesaa:viesaa #friend
vuoruo:vuoruo #sky
zangna:zangna #faith
ziekuo:ziekuo #cat
ziytuv:ziytuv #flower
zuosa:zuosa #dinner
#
#
LEXICON NPRoot
Abyipa:Abyipa #Lord
Byi:Byi #Byi
Hiekha:Hiekha #Kakha
Judah:Judah #Judah
Khazing:Khazing #God
Khrih:Khrih #Christ
Paul:Paul #Paul
Piter:Piter #Peter
Vieruo:Vierou #Burma
Vuo:Vuo #Byi
Zingsuv:Zingsuv #Jesus
#
#
Abraham:Abraham #Abraham
Antiok:Antiok #Antioch
Asia:Asia #Asia
Barnabas:Barnabas #Barnabas
David:David #David
Efesa:Efesa #Ephesus
Elijah:Elijah #Elijah
Farasi:Farasi #Pharasee
Filip:Filip #Philip
Galilee:Galilee #Galilee
Grik:Grik #Greek
Herod:Herod #Herod
Isaiah:Isaiah #Isaiah
Isak:Isak #Isaac
Israel:Israel #Israel
Izipt:Izipt #Egypt
Jakob:Jakob #Jacob
Jeim:Jeim #James
Jentail:Jentail #Gentile
Jerusalem:Jerusalem #Jerusalem
Johan:Johan #John
Josef:Josef #Joseph
Judas:Judas #Judas
Judea:Judea #Judea
Lazaruh:Lazaruh #Lazarus
Mary:Mary #Mary
Masidonia:Masidonia #Macedonia
Messiah:Messiah #Messiah
Moses:Moses #Moses
Nazareth:Nazareth #Nazareth
Pilat:Pilat #Pilate
Rom:Rom #Rome
Sabbath:Sabbath #Sabbath
Samaria:Samaria #Samaria
Saul:Saul #Saul
Silas:Silas #Silas
Simon:Simon #Simon
Sisaria:Sisaria #Ceasarea
Timote:Timote #Timothy
#
#
Bawi:Bawi #Bawi
Sui:Sui #Sui
Zai:Zai #Zai
Indianapolis:Indianapolis


##verbs
LEXICON VRoot
achaa:chaa #step on	<<<review
la:la #grab
alaw:alaw #surpass
apuvthe:apuvthe #be pretty  <<<review
ta:ta #say
aw:aw #copula be
baa:baa #eat
by:by #bury
bya:bya #help
bya:bya #water
caa:caa #cry
cabe:cabe #hit
cade:cade #chase
cakaa:cakaa #get sick
caki:caki #pinch
cakuo:cakuo #go, walk
calyi:calyi #buy
cang:cang #play
cape:cape #write
ce:ce #eat
cha:cha #wake up (from nightmare or comma)
chang:chang #tell
chiy:chiy #arrive
chung:chung #cook
ciy:ciy #kick
cuo:cuo #copula be
daa:daa #stand
dang:dang #drink
daw:daw #get bit by a snake
ding:ding #rest
due:due #love
haa:haa #pick up (from ground)
hmung:hmung #see
hmung:hmung #sleep
hluo:hluo #take, borrow
hnyi:hnyi #have
hrie:hrie #work
hriy:hriy #wear
hryi:hryi #ask
hyi:hyi #turn head and look 
ka:ka #shoot
kang:kang #be cold
khing:khing #want #TODO: also aux
khu:khu #can
kie:kie #ascend
kie:kie #fry
kii:kii #hatch
kuo:kuo #burn
kuu:kuu #be wide
kyi:kyi #crack
ky:ky #dry up
lie:lie #fall (people)
ling:ling #plant
luo:luo #dance
mang:mang #look at
maw:maw #drive
nang:nang #be hungry
ngie:ngie #obey, listen to, enter
ning:ning #eat
ning:ning #day (ningkha = one day)
pachang:pachang #know
pahaw:pahaw #open
pahmung:pahmung #injure
pahnyi:pahnyi #laugh
palie:palie #respond
para:para #break (a device stops working)
paruv:paruv #steal
pasa:pasa #be sick
pasiy:pasiy #wash (anything)
pasuv:pasuv #wash (clothes & fabrics, delicate) 
pha:pha #arrive
phiy:phiy #sweep
phya:phya #carry
pi:pi #give
pu:pu #thrive, grow
ri:ri #read
rukhya:rukhya #degut fish
ruo:ruo #run
rue:rue #think
syi:syi #be big
sung:sung #lose
suv:suv #hit
ta:ta #say/tell
taw:taw #meet
te:te #brush (teeth)
thaw:thaw #throw
thie:thie #kill
thiy:thiy #die
thiydiy:thiydiy #drop of blood
thiy:thiy #blood
thla:thla #drop/put
thle:thle #change clothes
thluo:thluo #might
thu:thu #to get up
thyi:thyi #hear
tla:tla #fall (objects)
tlechuo:tlechuo #like
tluo:tluo #cure
tu:tu #hear
tu:tu #sit
tue:tue #do, work
tue:tue #celebrate
uo:uo #cut (with a small knife)
u:u #call
unga:unga #bark 
vaa:vaa #go
vaw:vaw #come
ve:ve #visit
zaa:zaa #sell
zang:zang #believe
ziy:ziy #follow
zu:zu #fly
zue:zue #compete


##Adjectives
LEXICON Adj
aapale:aapale #boastful
adawchipa:adawchipa #poor
ahringpa:ahringpa #green
alung:alung #be warm 	<<<review
anuo:anuo #happy
apahuopa:apahuopa #tasty
apang:apang #round
caa:caa #dry (for food)
cahre:cahre #be sharp
cie:cie #be certain
chi:chi #be afraid
haa:haa #slow
haatiy:haatiy #young
hring:hring #green
kuu:kuu #be wide
lee:lee #be big
macuo:macuo #be old
ngie:ngie #near
ngiechi:ngiechi #sad
pha:phca #good
pahuo:pahuo #tasty
pathe:pathe #clean
puvthe:puvthe #beautiful/handsome/appealing
pya:pya #be dirty
ruv:ruv #be difficult
sing:sing #smart
taa:taa #small
thaa:thaa #new
thing:thing #wooden (made of wood)
thlung:thlung #be sweet
thyiking:thyiking #cute, gorgeous
vaw:vaw #black
